dictsource/ku_rules
// Kurdish translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L01 î iy ê ew ey   // front vowels

.group a
        a        a

     @) a (_S1   %a
     @) an (_S2  %an

.group b
        b        b
        
.group c
        c        dZ

.group ç
        ç        tS

.group d
        d        d

.group e
        e        E
        e (_     E#
        ew       eU
        ey       eI

.group ê
        ê        e

     @) ê (_S1   %e
     @) ên (_S2  %en


.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
        g (L01   J

.group h
        h        h

.group i
        i        I

.group î
        î        i

.group j
        j        Z

.group k
        k        k
        k (L01   c

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m

.group n
        n        n

.group o
        o        o

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        q

.group r
        r        R
        rr       R
     A) r (A     *

.group s
        s        s

.group ş
        ş        S

.group t
        t        t

.group u
        u        U

.group û
        û        u

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        x
        xwe      xw8

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        ö        I:
        ü        y
        $        dUlar

// Hemin 
// replace Arabic  eastern  character numbers with Arabic western character numbers
.replace
     ٠       0
     ۰       0
     ۱       1
     ١       1
     ٢       2
     ۲       2
     ٣       3
     ۳       3
     ٤       4
     ۴       4
     ٥       5
     ۵       5
     ٦       6
     ۶       6
     ٧       7
     ۷       7
     ٨       8
     ۸       8
     ٩       9
     ۹       9
     ،       ,
     ؛       ;  
     ٬       ،
     ٫       ،
     ٪       %

.L02 ی ا ي ێ و ە   // front vowels

// all Arabic characters
.L03  ـ « » ض ص ث ق ڤ ف غ ع ه خ چ ح ج ش س ي ب ڵ ل ت ن م ك ظ ط ژ ز ڕ ر ذ د ئ و ۆ ة ێ ی ؤ إ ا أ ء پ گ

// group of digits
.L04 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9

.group آ
         آ           ?a:

.group ا
         ا           a
   
.group أ
         أ           ?        // Carried Hamza

.group إ
         إ           ?        // Carried Hamza

.group ئ
         ئ           ?
         ئ (_        ?         // Carried Hamza
      _) ئ           ?

.group ب
         ب           b
         ب (_        b 
      _) ب           b         

.group پ
         پ           p
         پ (_        p
      _) پ           p

.group ت
         ت           t
         ت _(        t
      _) ت           t

.group ث
         ث           T
         ث _(        T
      _) ث           T

.group ج
         ج           dZ
         ج _(        dZ
      _) ج           dZ

.group چ
         چ           tS
         چ _(        tS
      _) چ           tS

.group ح
         ح           H
         ح _(        H
      _) ح           H

.group خ
         خ           x
         خ _(        x
      _) خ           x

.group د
         د           d
         د _(        d
      _) د           d

.group ذ
         ذ           D
         ذ _(        D
      _) ذ           D

.group ر
         ر           r
         ر _(        r
      _) ر           r

.group ڕ
         ڕ           r:
         ڕ _(        r:
      _) ڕ           r:

.group ز
         ز           z
         ز _(        z
         ز           z

.group ژ
         ژ           Z
         ژ _(        Z
      _) ژ           Z

.group س
         س           s
         س _(        s
      _) س           s

.group ش
         ش           S
         ش _(        S
      _) ش           S

.group ص
         ص           s[
         ص _(        s[
      _) ص           s[

.group ض
         ض           dH
         ض _(        dH
      _) ض           dH

.group ط
         ط           t[
         ط _(        t[
      _) ط           t[

.group ظ
         ظ           Z:
         ظ _(        Z:
      _) ظ           Z:

.group ع
         ع           A
         ع _(        A
         ع           A

.group غ
         غ           gH
         غ _(        gH
      _) غ           gH

.group ف
         ف           f
         ف _(        f
      _) ف           f

.group ڤ
         ڤ           v
         ڤ _(        v
      _) ڤ           v
 
.group ق
         ق           q
         ق _(        q
      _) ق           q

.group ك
         ك           k
         ك _(        k
      _) ك           k

.group ک
         ک           k
         ک _(        k
      _) ک           k

.group گ
         گ           g
         گ _(        g
      _) گ           g

.group ل
         ل           l
         ل _(        l
      _) ل           l

.group ڵ
         ڵ           l:
         ڵ _(        l:
      _) ڵ           l:

.group م
         م           m
         م _(        m
      _) م           m

.group ن
         ن           n
         ن _(        n
      _) ن           n

.group ه
         ه           h
         ه _(        h
     _)  ه           h

.group ە
         ە           E
         ە _(        E
      _) ە           E

.group و
         و           w
         و _(        w
      _) و           w

.group وو
         وو          w:
         وو _(       w:
      _) وو          w:

.group ۆ
         ۆ           o
         ۆ _(        o
      _) ۆ           o
 
.group ي
         ي           i
         ي _(        i
         ي (L01      j
    (L01 ي           j
      _) ي           j

.group ى                      
         ى           i
         ى _(        i
         ى (L01      j
    (L01 ى           j
      _) ى           j

.group ێ                      
         ێ           e
         ێ _(        e
      _) ێ           e

.group ء
         ء           ?
         ء _(        ?
      _) ء           ?

.group ؤ
         ؤ           ?
         ؤ _(        ?
      _) ؤ           ?         

.group ة
         ة           t
         ة _(        t
      _) ة           t

// Other diacritics
.group
         ـ  // tatweel
